Alabama, session 2026rs, SB321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
50 Section 1. Sections 13A-12-214.5 and 13A-12-214.6 are
51 added to the Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
52 §13A-12-214.5
53 (a) For purposes of this section, "psychoactive
54 cannabinoids" means cannabinoids derived from or found in hemp
55 as defined in Section 2-8-381, including, but not limited to,
56 delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol,
Page 2

delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol,
SB321 INTRODUCED
57 and delta-10-tetrahydrocannabinol.
58 (b) Except as otherwise authorized by law, a person
59 commits the crime of unlawful possession of psychoactive
60 cannabinoids in the first degree if:
61 (1) He or she possesses psychoactive cannabinoids for
62 other than personal use; or
63 (2) He or she possesses psychoactive cannabinoids for
64 his or her personal use only after having been previously
65 convicted of unlawful possession of psychoactive cannabinoids
66 in the second degree or unlawful possession of psychoactive
67 cannabinoids for his or her personal use only.
68 (c) Unlawful possession of psychoactive cannabinoids in
69 the first degree pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) is a Class C
70 felony.
71 (d) Unlawful possession of psychoactive cannabinoids in
72 the first degree pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) is a Class D
73 felony.
74 §13A-12-214.6
75 (a) For purposes of this section, "psychoactive
76 cannabinoids" has the same meaning as provided in Section
77 13A-12-214.5.
78 (b) Except as otherwise authorized by law, a person
79 commits the crime of unlawful possession of psychoactive
80 cannabinoids in the second degree if he or she possesses
81 psychoactive cannabinoids for his or her personal use only.
82 (c) Unlawful possession of psychoactive cannabinoids in
83 the second degree is a Class A misdemeanor.
84 Section 2. Section 20-2-23, Code of Alabama 1975, is
Page 3

Section 2. Section 20-2-23, Code of Alabama 1975, is
SB321 INTRODUCED
85 amended to read as follows:
86 "§20-2-23
87 (a) The Legislature finds the following:
88 (1) New synthetic substances are being created which
89 are not controlled under the provisions of existing state law
90 but which have a potential for abuse similar to or greater
91 than that for substances controlled under existing state law.
92 These new synthetic substances are called "synthetic
93 controlled substances or synthetic controlled substance
94 analogues" and can be designed to produce a desired
95 pharmacological effect and to evade the controlling statutory
96 provisions. Synthetic controlled substances or synthetic
97 controlled substance analogues are being manufactured,
98 distributed, possessed, and used as substitutes for controlled
99 substances.
100 (2) The hazards attributable to the traffic in and use
101 of a synthetic controlled substance or synthetic controlled
102 substance analogues are increased because their unregulated
103 manufacture produces variations in purity and concentration.
104 (3) Many new synthetic substances are untested, and it
105 cannot be immediately determined whether they have useful
106 medical or chemical purposes.
107 (4) The uncontrolled importation, manufacture,
108 distribution, possession, or use of controlled substance
109 analogues has a substantial and detrimental impact on the
110 health and safety of the people of this state.
111 (5) Synthetic controlled substances or synthetic
112 controlled substance analogues can be created more rapidly
Page 4

controlled substance analogues can be created more rapidly
SB321 INTRODUCED
113 than they can be identified and controlled by action of the
114 Legislature. There is a need for a speedy determination of
115 their proper classification under existing law. It is
116 therefore necessary to identify and classify new substances
117 that have a potential for abuse, so that they can be
118 controlled in the same manner as other substances controlled
119 under existing state law.
120 (b) The controlled substances listed in this section
121 are included in Schedule I:
122 (1) Any of the following opiates, including their
123 isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters,
124 and ethers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the
125 existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is
126 possible within the specific chemical designation:
127 a. Acetylmethadol;
128 b. Allylprodine;
129 c. Alphacetylmethadol;
130 d. Alphameprodine;
131 e. Alphamethadol;
132 f. Benzethidine;
133 g. Betacetylmethadol;
134 h. Betameprodine;
135 i. Betamethadol;
136 j. Betaprodine;
137 k. Clonitazene;
138 l. Dextromoramide;
139 m. Dextrorphan;
140 n. Diampromide;
Page 5

n. Diampromide;
SB321 INTRODUCED
141 o. Diethylthiambutene;
142 p. Dimenoxadol;
143 q. Dimepheptanol;
144 r. Dimethylthiambutene;
145 s. Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
146 t. Dipipanone;
147 u. Ethylmethylthiambutene;
148 v. Etonitazene;
149 w. Etoxeridine;
150 x. Furethidine;
151 y. Hydroxypethidine;
152 z. Ketobemidone;
153 aa. Levomoramide;
154 bb. Levophenacylmorphan;
155 cc. Morpheridine;
156 dd. Noracymethadol;
157 ee. Norlevorphanol;
158 ff. Normethadone;
159 gg. Norpipanone;
160 hh. Phenadoxone;
161 ii. Phenampromide;
162 jj. Phenomorphan;
163 kk. Phenoperidine;
164 ll. Piritramide;
165 mm. Proheptazine;
166 nn. Properidine;
167 oo. Racemoramide;
168 pp. Trimeperidine.
Page 6

pp. Trimeperidine.
SB321 INTRODUCED
169 (2) Any of the following opium derivatives, their
170 salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically
171 excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, and
172 salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
173 designation:
174 a. Acetorphine;
175 b. Acetyldihydrocodeine;
176 c. Benzylmorphine;
177 d. Codeine methylbromide;
178 e. Codeine-N-Oxide;
179 f. Cyprenorphine;
180 g. Desomorphine;
181 h. Dihydromorphine;
182 i. Etorphine;
183 j. Heroin;
184 k. Hydromorphinol;
185 l. Methyldesorphine;
186 m. Methyldihydromorphine;
187 n. Morphine methylbromide;
188 o. Morphine methylsulfonate;
189 p. Morphine-N-Oxide;
190 q. Myrophine;
191 r. Nicocodeine;
192 s. Nicomorphine;
193 t. Normorphine;
194 u. Pholcodine;
195 v. Thebacon.
196 (3) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
Page 7

(3) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
SB321 INTRODUCED
197 which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic
198 substances, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, unless
199 specifically excepted, whenever the existence of these salts,
200 isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
201 chemical designation:
202 a. 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
203 b. 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
204 c. 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;
205 d. Bufotenine;
206 e. Diethyltryptamine;
207 f. Dimethyltryptamine;
208 g. 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy amphetamine;
209 h. Ibogaine;
210 i. Lysergic acid diethylamide;
211 j. MarihuanaMarijuana;
212 k. Mescaline;
213 l. Peyote;
214 m. N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
215 n. N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
216 o. Psilocybin;
217 p. Psilocyn;
218 q. Tetrahydrocannabinols, except for
219 tetrahydrocannabinols nonpsychoactive cannabinoids derived
220 from or found in hemp, as defined in Section 2-8-381.
221 (4)a. A synthetic controlled substance that is any
222 material, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity
223 of the following chemical compounds, their salts, isomers, and
224 salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the
Page 8

salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the
SB321 INTRODUCED
225 existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
226 possible within the specific chemical designation or compound:
227 1. 3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone (Methylone), some
228 trade or other names: 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-methylcathinone.
229 2. 3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone, some other trade
230 names: (MDPV).
231 3. 4-Methylmethcathinone (Mephedrone), some trade or
232 other names: 4-methylephedrone.
233 4. 4-Methoxymethcathinone (Methedrone), some trade or
234 other names: bk-PMMA.
235 5. 3-Fluoromethcathinone, some trade or other names:
236 3-FMC.
237 6. 4-Fluoromethcathinone (Flephedrone), some trade or
238 other names: 4-FMC.
239 7.
240 1-[(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indol-3-yl]-(2-iodophenyl)methanone,
241 some trade or other names: AM-694.
242 8.
243 1-[(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indol-3-yl]-(naphthalen-1-yl)methanone,
244 some trade or other names: AM-2201.
245 9. (6aR, 10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,
246 6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[
247 c]chromen-1-ol, some trade or other names: HU-210.
248 10.
249 (6aS,10aS)-9-(Hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-y
250 l)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol, some trade or
251 other names: HU-211, Dexanabinol.
252 11. 1-Pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole, some trade
Page 9

11. 1-Pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole, some trade
SB321 INTRODUCED
253 or other names: JWH-007.
254 12.
255 (2-Methyl-1-propyl-1H-indol-3-yl)-1-naphthalenylmethanone,
256 some trade or other names: JWH-015.
257 13. Naphthalen-1-yl-(1-pentylindol-3-yl)methanone, some
258 trade or other names: JWH-018.
259 14. 1-Hexyl-3-(naphthalen-1-oyl)indole, some trade or
260 other names: JWH-019.
261 15. Naphthalen-1-yl-(butylindol-3-yl)methanone, some
262 trade or other names: JWH-073.
263 16.
264 4-Methoxynaphthalen-1-yl-(1-pentylindol-3-yl)methanone, some
265 trade or other names: JWH-081.
266 17.
267 4-Methoxynaphthalen-1-yl-(1-pentyl-2-methylindol-3-yl)
268 methanone, some trade or other names: JWH-098.
269 18.
270 4-Methylnaphthalen-1-yl-(1-pentylindol-3-yl)methanone, some
271 trade or other names: JWH-122.
272 19.
273 (1-(2-Morpholin-4-ylethyl)indol-3-yl)-naphthalen-1-ylmethanone
274 , some trade or other names: JWH-200.
275 20. 2-(2-Chlorophenyl)-1-(1-pentylindol-3-yl)ethanone,
276 some trade or other names: JWH-203.
277 21.
278 4-Ethylnaphthalen-1-yl-(1-pentylindol-3-yl)methanone, some
279 trade or other names: JWH-210.
280 22. 2-(2-Methoxyphenyl)-1-(1-pentylindol-3-yl)ethanone,
Page 10

22. 2-(2-Methoxyphenyl)-1-(1-pentylindol-3-yl)ethanone,
SB321 INTRODUCED
281 some trade or other names: JWH-250.
282 23.
283 5-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-pentylpyrrol-3-yl)-naphthalen-1-ylmethano
284 ne, some trade or other names: JWH-307.
285 24. 1-Pentyl-3-(4-Chloro-1-naphthoyl)indole, some trade
286 or other names: JWH-398.
287 25.
288 2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-5-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)phenol
289 (Cannabicyclohexanol), some trade or other names: CP 47, 497,
290 and homologues.
291 26.
292 2-(2-Methoxyphenyl)-1-[1-(2-cyclohexylethyl)indol-3-yl]ethanon
293 e, some trade or other names: RCS-8, SR-18.
294 27.
295 2-(4-Methoxyphenyl)-1-(1-pentyl-indol-3-yl)methanone, some
296 trade or other names: RCS-4.
297 28.
298 (R)-(+)-[2,3-Dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4-morpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo[1
299 ,2,3-de]-1,4-benzoxazin-6-yl]-1-napthalenylmethanone, some
300 trade or other names: WIN 55,212-2.
301 29.
302 (4-Methoxyphenyl)-[2-methyl-1-(2-morpholin-4-ylethyl)indol-3-y
303 l]methanone, some trade or other names: WIN 48,098,
304 Pravadoline.
305 b. In addition to any material, mixture, or preparation
306 that contains any quantity of the chemical compounds listed in
307 paragraph a., a synthetic controlled substance also includes
308 the following chemical compounds, their salts, isomers, and
Page 11

the following chemical compounds, their salts, isomers, and
SB321 INTRODUCED
309 salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the
310 existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
311 possible within the specific chemical designation or compound:
312 1.
313 1-[(N-methylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl]-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole,
314 some trade or other names: (AM-2233).
315 2. 1-Pentyl-3-(1-adamantoyl)indole, some trade or other
316 names: (AB001).
317 3.
318 [1-[(1-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl]-1H-indol-3-yl]-1-naphthale
319 nyl-methanone, some trade or other names: (AM1220).
320 4.
321 1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyoyl)indole,
322 some trade or other names: (XLR11).
323 5. 1-Pentyl-3-(2,2,3,3-tetramethycyclopropoyl)indole,
324 some trade or other names: (UR-144).
325 6.
326 6-Methyl-2[(4-methylphenyl)amino]-4H-3,1-benzoxazin-4-one,
327 some trade or other names: (URB 754).
328 7. [1,1'-biphenyl]-3-yl-carbamic acid, cyclohexyl
329 ester, some trade or other names: (URB 602).
330 8.
331 (3'-(Aminocarbonyl)[1,1'-biphenyl]-3-yl)-cyclohexylcarbamate,
332 some trade or other names: (URB597).
333 9. 1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole,
334 some trade or other names: (MAM2201).
335 10.
336 1-naphthalenyl[4-(pentyloxy)-naphthalenyl]methanone, some
Page 12

1-naphthalenyl[4-(pentyloxy)-naphthalenyl]methanone, some
SB321 INTRODUCED
337 trade or other names: (CB-13).
338 11.
339 1-(5-Chloropentyl)-3-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole,
340 some trade or other names: (5-Chloro-UR-144).
341 12.
342 1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-N-tricyclo[3,3,1,13,7]dec-1-yl-1H-indole-3-
343 carboxamide, some trade or other names: (STS-135).
344 13.
345 1[(N-Methylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl]-3-(adamant-1-oyl)indole,
346 some trade or other names: (AM1248).
347 14. N-Adamantyl-1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxamide, some
348 trade or other names: (SDB-001, 2NE1).
349 15.
350 1-Pentyl-N-tricyclo[3,3,1,13,7]dec-1-yl-1H-indazole-3-carboxam
351 ide, some trade or other names: (AKB48, APINACA).
352 16. 3-Naphthoylindole.
353 17.
354 1-[2-(4-Morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)i
355 ndole, some trade or other names: (A 796,260).
356 18.
357 1-[(tetrahydropyran-4-ylmethyl)-1H-indol-3-yl]-(2,2,3,3-tetram
358 ethylcyclopropyl)methanone, some trade or other names: (A
359 834,735).
360 19. 1-(Pent-4-en-1-yl)-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole,
361 some trade or other names: (JWH-122 4-pentenyl analog).
362 20.
363 N-[(1S)-1-(aminocarbonyl)-2-methylpropyl]-1-[(4-fluorophenyl)m
364 ethyl]-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide some trade or other names:
365 (AB-FUBINACA).
Page 13

(AB-FUBINACA).
SB321 INTRODUCED
366 21.
367 [1-(5-bromopentyl)-1H-indol-3-yl](2,2,3,3-tetramethylcycloprop
368 yl)methanone, some trade or other names: (5-Bromo-UR-144)
369 22.
370 5-(1,1-Dimethyloctyl)-2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexylphenol,
371 some trade or other names: (CP-47,497 C8 homolog).
372 23.
373 1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-N-tricyclo[3,3,1,13,7]dec-1-yl-1H-indazole-
374 3-carboxamide, some trade or other names: (5F-AKB48,
375 5F-APINACA).
376 24. 1-(penta-4-ene)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole, some trade
377 or other names: (JWH-022).
378 25. 1-(5-Chloropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole, some
379 trade or other names: (Chloro-AM-2201, JWH-018
380 N-5-chloropentyl analog).
381 26. 1-(5-Hydroxypentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole, some
382 trade or other names: (Hydroxy-AM-2201).
383 27.
384 N-[(2E)-3-(2-Methoxyethyl)4,5-dimethyl-1,3-thiazole-2(3H)-ylid
385 ene]-2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropane carboxamide, some trade
386 or other names: (A 836,339).
387 28. 1-Pentyl-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole, some trade or
388 other names: (AM 679).
389 29. 1-Pentyl-3-(2-methylphenacetyl)indole, some trade
390 or other names: (JWH-251).
391 30. 1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl
392 ester, some trade or other names: (PB-22, QUPIC).
393 31. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid
Page 14

31. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid
SB321 INTRODUCED
394 8-quinolinyl ester, some trade or other names: (5F-PB-22).
395 32.
396 1-pentyl-N-(naphthalen-1-yl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide, some
397 trade or other names: (MN-24, NNE1).
398 33. 1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylic acid
399 8-quinolinyl ester, some trade or other names: (BB-22,
400 QUCHIC).
401 34.
402 N-[(1S)-1-(aminocarbonyl)-2-methylpropyl]-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-
403 -3-carboxamide, some trade or other names: (AB-PINACA).
404 35.
405 7-methoxy-1-(2-morpholinoethyl)-N-((1S,2S,4R)-1,3,3-trimethylb
406 icyclo[2.2.1]heptan-2-yl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamide, some trade
407 or other names: (MN-25).
408 36. ADB-PINACA.
409 37. FUB-AKB-48.
410 38. FUB-PB-22.
411 39. Heptyl-UR144.
412 40. THJ-018.
413 41. THJ-2201.
414 42. 1-heptyl-3-(1-napthoyl)indole), some trade or other
415 names: (JWH-20).
416 43. Napthalen-1-yl-(1-propyl-1H-indol-3-yl)methanone,
417 some trade or other names: (JWH-072).
418 44. (6aR,10aR)-3-(1, 1-Dimethylbutyl)-6a, 7, 10,
419 10a-tetrahydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-6H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran, some
420 trade or other names: (JWH-133).
421 45. 3-(napthalen-1-ylmethyl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole, some
Page 15

45. 3-(napthalen-1-ylmethyl)-1-pentyl-1H-indole, some
SB321 INTRODUCED
422 trade or other names: (JWH-175).
423 46. 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxyophenylacetyl)indole, some
424 trade or other names: (JWH-201).
425 47. 1-pentyl-3-(3-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole, some
426 trade or other names: (JWH 302).
427 48.
428 [(1R,2R,5R)-2-[2,6-dimethoxy-4-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)phenyl]-7,7-
429 -dimethyl-4-bicyclo[3.1.1]hept-3-enyl]methanol, some trade or
430 other names: (HU-308).
431 49.
432 3-hydroxy-2-[(1R,6R)-3-methyl-6-(1-methylethenyl)-2-cyclohexen-
433 -1-yl]-5-pentyl-2,5-cyclohexadiene-1,4-dione, some trade or
434 other names: (HU-331).
435 50.
436 N-cyclopropyl-11-(3-hydroxy-5-pentylphenoxy)-undecanamide,
437 some trade or other names: (CB-25).
438 51.
439 N-cyclopropyl-11-(2-hexyl-5-hydroxyphenoxy)-undecanamide, some
440 trade or other names: (CB-52).
441 52.
442 2-[(1R,2R,5R)-5-hydroxy-2-(3-hydroxypropyl)cyclohexyl]-5-(2-me
443 thyloctan-2-yl)phenol, some trade or other names:
444 (CB-55,940)(CB-55).
445 53. 4-Methylethylcathinone, some trade or other names:
446 (4-MEC, 4-Methylethcathinone).
447 54. 4'-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone, some
448 trade or other names: (MPPP, ZZ-1).
449 55.
Page 16

55.
SB321 INTRODUCED
450 (RS)-1-naphthalen-2-yl-2-pyrrolidin-1-ylpentan-1-one, some
451 trade or other names: (Naphyrone).
452 56. alpha,alpha-Diphenyl-2-piperidinemethanol, some
453 trade or other names: (Pipradrol, Meratran).
454 57.
455 (RS)-1-(4-methylphenyl)-2-(1-pyrrolidinyl)pentan-1-one, some
456 trade or other names: (Pyrovalerone).
457 58. 3,4-Dimethylmethcathinone, some trade or other
458 names: (3,4-DMMC).
459 59. 4-Fluoroamphetamine, some trade or other names:
460 (4-FA).
461 60. 4-Fluoromethamphetamine, some trade or other names:
462 (4-FMA).
463 61. Butylone, some trade or other names: (bk-MBDB).
464 62. alpha-Pyrrolidinopentiophenone, some trade or other
465 names: (alpha-PVP).
466 63. beta-keto-Dimethylbenzodioxolylbutanamine, some
467 trade or other names: (bk-DMBDB).
468 64. 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylbutan-1-one, some trade or
469 other names: (Buphedrone).
470 65. (RS)-2-ethylamino-1-phenyl-propan-1-one, some trade
471 or other names: (N-Ethylcathinone).
472 66. 2-Fluoroamphetamine, some trade or other names:
473 (2-FA).
474 67. Methoxetamine, some trade or other names: (MXE).
475 68. 2-Methylamino-1-phenylpentan-1-one, some trade or
476 other names: (Pentedrone).
477 69. 3,4-Methylenedioxycathinone, some trade or other
Page 17

69. 3,4-Methylenedioxycathinone, some trade or other
SB321 INTRODUCED
478 names: (MDC).
479 70. 2-Fluoromethamphetamine, some trade or other names:
480 (2-FMA).
481 71. 4-methylmethamphetamine, some trade or other names:
482 (4-MMA).
483 72. 4-Fluoroisocathinone, some trade or other names:
484 (4-FIC).
485 73. 3-Fluoromethamphetamine, some trade or other names:
486 (3-FMA).
487 74. Methiopropamine, some trade or other names: (MPA).
488 75. alpha-Pyrrolidinobutiophenone, some trade or other
489 names: (alpha-PBP).
490 76. 4-Methoxy-N-methylcathinone, some trade or other
491 names: (Methedrone, bk-PMMA).
492 77. alpha-Pyrrolidinopropiophenone, some trade or other
493 names: (alpha-PPP).
494 78. (RS)-2-benzhydrylpiperidine, some trade or other
495 names: (Desoxypipradrol).
496 79. 3,4-Methylenedioxyethylcathinone, some trade or
497 other names: (MDEC).
498 80. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone,
499 some trade or other names: (MDPBP).
500 81.
501 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(methylamino)pentan-1-one
502 (Pentylone, bk-MBDP).
503 82. 3-Fluoroamphetamine, some trade or other names:
504 (3-FA).
505 83. 3-Fluoromethcathinone, some trade or other names:
Page 18

83. 3-Fluoromethcathinone, some trade or other names:
SB321 INTRODUCED
506 (3-FMC).
507 84. 2-Fluoromethcathinone, some trade or other names:
508 (2-FMC).
509 85.
510 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(dimethylamino)propan-1-one
511 (bk-MDDMA).
512 86. N,N-Diethylcathinone, some trade or other names:
513 (Amfepramone, DEC).
514 87. 1,3-Dimethylamylamine, some trade or other names:
515 (DMAA).
516 88. N, N-Dimethylcathinone, some trade or other names:
517 (DMC).
518 89. N-Ethyl-3,4-methylenedioxycathinone, some trade or
519 other names: (bk-MDEA).
520 90. N-Ethylamphetamine, some trade or other names:
521 (EMA).
522 91. N-Ethylcathinone, some trade or other names: (EC).
523 92. 2-Ethylethcathinone, some trade or other names:
524 (2-EEC).
525 93. 4-Ethyl-N-ethylcathinone, some trade or other
526 names: (4-EEC).
527 94.
528 2-(5-Methoxy-1-benzofuran-3-yl)-N,N-dimethylethanamine, some
529 trade or other names: (Dimembfe).
530 95. 2-(5-Methoxy-1-benzofuran-3-yl)N-ethylethamine.
531 96. 4-Methoxymethamphetamine, some trade or other
532 names: (PMMA).
533 97. 4-Methoxy-N-ethylamphetamine, some trade or other
Page 19

97. 4-Methoxy-N-ethylamphetamine, some trade or other
SB321 INTRODUCED
534 names: (PMEA).
535 98. 4-Methoxy-N-ethylcathinone, some trade or other
536 names: (ETHEDRONE).
537 99. 3-Methylmethcathinone, some trade or other names:
538 (3-MMC).
539 100. 4-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone, some trade
540 or other names: (MPBP).
541 101. 2-Methylethcathinone, some trade or other names:
542 (2-MEC).
543 102. 3-Methylethcathinone, some trade or other names:
544 (3-MEC).
545 103. 2-Ethylethcathinone, some trade or other names:
546 (2-EEC).
547 104. 3-Ethylethcathinone, some trade or other names:
548 (3-EEC).
549 105. 3-Ethylmethcathinone, some trade or other names:
550 (3-EMC).
551 106.
552 3',4'-Methylenedioxy-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone, some
553 trade or other names: (MDPPP).
554 107. alpha-Pyrrolidinopentiothiophenone, some trade or
555 other names: (alpha-PVT).
556 108. 3-Methoxymethcathinone, some trade or other names:
557 (3-MeOMC).
558 109. N-Methyl-1,3-benzodioxolylbutanamine, some trade
559 or other names: (MBDB).
560 110. Ethcathinone, some trade or other names:
561 (ETHYLPROPION, ETH-CAT).
Page 20

(ETHYLPROPION, ETH-CAT).
SB321 INTRODUCED
562 111. Ethylone (3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone).
563 112. N-N-Diethyl-3,4-methylenedioxycathinone.
564 113. 3,4-methylenedioxy-propiophenone.
565 114. 2-Bromo-3,4-methylenedioxypropiophenone.
566 115. 3,4-methylenedioxy-propiophenone-2-oxime.
567 116. N-Acetyl-3,4-methylenedioxycathinone.
568 117. N-Acetyl-N-Methyl-3,4-methylenedioxycathinone.
569 118. N-Acetyl-N-Ethyl-3,4-methylenedioxycathinone.
570 119. 4-Bromomethcathinone.
571 120. 3-Bromomethcathinone.
572 121. Eutylone (beta-Keto-Ethylbenzodioxolylbutanamine).
573 122. 4'-Methoxy-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone, some
574 trade or other names: (MOPPP).
575 123. 4'-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone, some
576 trade or other names: (MPHP).
577 124. Benocyclidine (BCP) or
578 Benzothiophenylcyclohexylpiperidine, some trade or other
579 names: (BTCP).
580 125. 4-Fluoro-(methylamino)butyrophenone, some trade or
581 other names: (F-MABP).
582 126. 3-Methyl-4-Methoxymethacathinone, some trade or
583 other names: (3-Me-4-MeO-MCAT).
584 127. 4-Methyl-(ethylamino)-butryophenone, some trade or
585 other names: (Me-EABP).
586 128. 4-Ethyl-methcathinone, some trade or other names:
587 (4-EMC).
588 129. 4-methoxy-N-ethylcathinone
589 (bk-PMC;p-methox-ethcathinone).
Page 21

(bk-PMC;p-methox-ethcathinone).
SB321 INTRODUCED
590 130. 4'-Methoxy-alpha-pyrroldino-propiophenone (MeOPPP;
591 4'-MeO-PPP).
592 131. 3-Fluorocathinone (3-FC).
593 132. 4-Fluorocathinone (4-FC).
594 133. 4-methyl-buphedrone (4-MeMABP; 4MeBP; BZ-6378).
595 134. 3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-benzylcathinone, some trade
596 or other names: (BMDP).
597 135. N-Benzyl-butylone, some trade or other names:
598 (BMDB).
599 136. N-Hydroxy-3,4-methlyenedioxymethcathinone.
600 137. N-ethylbuphedrone, some trade or other names:
601 (NEB).
602 138. 4-Fluorobuphedrone, some trade or other names:
603 (4-FBP).
604 139. 4-Methoxy-pyrrolidinbutrophenone (4-MeO-PBP).
605 140. 4-Ethyl-pyrrolidinobutrophenone, some trade or
606 other names: (4-Et-PBP).
607 141. 5-(2-aminopropyl)indole, some trade or other
608 names: (5-IT).
609 142. 1-phenyl-2-(piperidin-1-yl)butan-1-one.
610 143. 2,4,5-Trimethyl-methacathinone, some trade or
611 other names: (2,4,5-TMMC).
612 144. alpha-pyrrolidino-heptiophenone, some trade or
613 other names: (alpha-PHpP).
614 145. 4-Methylamphetamine (4-MA: pTAP; PAL-313; 4-MeA;
615 PmeA).
616 146. N-Ethyl-methamphetamine.
617 147. 4-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran, some trade or other
Page 22

147. 4-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran, some trade or other
SB321 INTRODUCED
618 names: (4-APB).
619 148. 5-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydro-1H-indene (5-APDI;
620 IAP; AIP; indanylaminoporpane).
621 149. 6,7-Methylenedioxy-2-aminotetralin, some trade or
622 other names: (MDAT).
623 150. 4-Methylthioamphetamine (4-MTA; P1882).
624 151. 4-Chloroamphetamine (p-chloro-amphetamine).
625 152. 2,4,6-Trimethoxyamphetamine, some trade or other
626 names: (TMA-6).
627 153. 2,4,5-Trimethoxyamphetamine, some trade or other
628 names: (TMA-2).
629 154. 2,5-Dimethylamphetamine, some trade or other
630 names: (2,5-DMA).
631 155. 3,4-Dimethylamphetamine, some trade or other
632 names: (3,4-DMA).
633 156. N-propylamphetamine.
634 157. 4-Hydroxyamphetamine.
635 158. 3-Hydroxyamphetamine.
636 159. Methylenedioxydimethylamphetamine, some trade or
637 other names: (MDDM).
638 160. 2-Aminoindane, some trade or other names: (2-AI).
639 161. 5,6-Methylenedioxy-N-methyl-aminoindane, some
640 trade or other names: (MDMAI).
641 162. 2C-T-21.
642 163. 2C-B-Fly.
643 164. 3,4-dimethyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine (2C-G).
644 165. 25D-NBOMe.
645 166. 25G-NBOMe.
Page 23

166. 25G-NBOMe.
SB321 INTRODUCED
646 167. 25N-NBOMe.
647 168. Bromo-benzyldifuranyl-isopropylamine, some trade
648 or other names: (Bromo Dragon Fly).
649 169. 3C-B fly.
650 170. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylthioamphetamine, some trade
651 or other names: (Aleph-2).
652 171. 1-[(4-ethoxy-2,5-dimethoxy)phenyl]propan-2-amine,
653 some trade or other names: (MEM).
654 172.
655 1-[2,5-dimethoxy-4-(propylthio)phenyl]propan-2-amine, some
656 trade or other names: (Aleph-7).
657 173. N-benzyl-2-phenylethylanamine.
658 174. N,N-dimethyl-2-phenylethanamine.
659 175. 6-chloro-2-aminotetralin, some trade or other
660 names: (6-CAT).
661 176. 2-phenylpropan-1-amine, some trade or other names:
662 (B-Me-PEA).
663 177. 2-Phenethylamine, some trade or other names:
664 (2-PEA).
665 178. 1-methylamino-1-(3,4-methylenedioxyphenyl)propane,
666 some trade or other names: (M-ALPHA).
667 179. Camfetamine.
668 180. Methoxyphenamine.
669 181. 4-methylaminorex, some trade or other names:
670 (4-MAR; 4-MAX; U4Euh; Euphoria; Ice).
671 182. (1-thiophen-2-yl)propan-2-amine
672 (Thienoamphetamine).
673 183. Dimethocaine.
Page 24

183. Dimethocaine.
SB321 INTRODUCED
674 184. 4-Fluoroephedrine.
675 185. 4-methyaminorex (p-methyl derivative).
676 186.
677 1-[(N-methylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl]-2-methyl-3-(naphthalen-1-oy
678 l)-6-nitroindole (AM1221).
679 187. (1-butyl-1H-indol-3-yl)(4-methoxyphenyl)-methanone
680 (RCS-4 (C4) homolog).
681 188. 5-[3-(1-naphthoyl)-1H-indole-1-yl]pentanenitrile,
682 some trade or other names: (AM2232).
683 189. 1-(Pentyl)-3-(4-bromo-1-naphthoyl)-indole, some
684 trade or other names: (JWH-387).
685 190. 1-(Pentyl)-3-(4-fluoro-1-naphthoyl)-indole, some
686 trade or other names: (JWH-412).
687 191. 1-(5-chlorpentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole, some
688 trade or other names: (AM694 Derivative).
689 192.
690 (2-iodo-5-nitrophenyl)-[1-[(1-methylpiperidin-2-yl]methyl]1H-i
691 ndol-3-yl]-methanone, some trade or other names: (AM1241).
692 193. 1-Pentyl-3-[1-(4-propyl)naphthoyl]indole, some
693 trade or other names: (JWH-182).
694 194. JWH-081 2-methoxynaphthyl isomer, some trade or
695 other names: (JWH-267).
696 195.
697 (3-methoxyphenyl)(1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)methanone, some trade
698 or other names: (RCS-4 3-methoxy isomer).
699 196.
700 [1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indol-3-yl](4-ethyl-1-naphthalenyl)-met
701 hanone (EAM-2201).
Page 25

hanone (EAM-2201).
SB321 INTRODUCED
702 197. ADB-FUBINACA.
703 198. ADBICA.
704 199. AM-279.
705 200. JWH-370.
706 201. NNE-1.
707 202. MAM-2201 chloropentyl derivative.
708 203. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-methyl-benzoyl)indole.
709 204. 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-ethylbenzoyl)indole.
710 205. AB-005.
711 206. AB-005 Azepane isomer.
712 207.
713 4-hydroxy-3,3,4-trimethyl-1-(1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)pentan-1-o
714 ne (4-HTMPIPO).
715 208. UR-12.
716 209. 5-Fluoro-ADBICA.
717 210. BAY-38-7271; KN 38-7271.
718 211. JTE-907.
719 212. Org 27569.
720 213. Org 27759.
721 214. Org 29647.
722 215. LY 2183240.
723 216. JTE 7-31.
724 217. URB 937.
725 218. 3-methoxy-eticyclidine, some trade or other names:
726 (3-MeO-PCE).
727 219. 1-Phenylcyclohexanamine, some trade or other
728 names: (PCA).
729 220. 4-Methyl-phencyclidine, some trade or other names:
Page 26

220. 4-Methyl-phencyclidine, some trade or other names:
SB321 INTRODUCED
730 (4-Me-PCP).
731 221. 4-Methoxy-eticyclidine, some trade or other names:
732 (4-MeO-PCE).
733 222. 4-Methoxyphencyclidine, some trade or other names:
734 (Methoxydine; 4MeO-PCP).
735 223. 3-Methoxyphencyclidine, some trade or other names:
736 (3-MeO-PCP).
737 224. 1-phenyl-N-propylcyclohexanamine, some trade or
738 other names: (PCPr).
739 225. N-(2-methoxyethyl)-1-phenylcyclohexanamine, some
740 trade or other names: (PCMEA).
741 226. N-(2-ethoxyethyl)-1-phenylcyclohexanamine, some
742 trade or other names: (PCEEA).
743 227. N-(3-methoxypropyl)-1-phenylcyclohexanamine, some
744 trade or other names: (PCMPA).
745 228. 3-Hydroxy-phencyclidine, some trade or other
746 names: (3-OH-PCP).
747 229. Methoxyketamine, some trade or other names:
748 (2-MeO-2-deschloro-ketamine).
749 230. Tiletamine, some trade or other names: (TCE).
750 231. N-ethylnorketamine.
751 232. N-Methyltryptamine, some trade or other names:
752 (NMT).
753 233. N-Methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine, some trade or
754 other names: (MiPT; MIPT).
755 234. 4-hydroxy-N,N-methylisopropyltryptamine, some
756 trade or other names: (4-OH-MiPT).
757 235. 4-Acetoxy-N,N-diisopropyl-tryptamine (4-AcO-DiPT:
Page 27

235. 4-Acetoxy-N,N-diisopropyl-tryptamine (4-AcO-DiPT:
SB321 INTRODUCED
758 4-AcO-DIPT; 4-Acetoxy-MiPT).
759 236. 4-Methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine, some trade or
760 other names: (4-MeO-DMT).
761 237. 5-Hydroxytryptamine, some trade or other names:
762 (5-HT).
763 238. 5-acetoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine, some trade or
764 other names: (5-AcO-DMT).
765 239. 5-Methoxy-N,N-dipropyltryptamine, some trade or
766 other names: (5-MeO-DPT).
767 240. d-Lysergic acid amide, some trade or other names:
768 (LSA; ergine).
769 241. 2,5-dimethoxy-4-chloroamphetamine, some trade or
770 other names: (DOC).
771 242.
772 N-(2-Methoxybenzyl)-4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine, some
773 trade or other names: (25I-NBOMe).
774 243. 4-Ethyl-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine, some trade or
775 other names: (2C-E).
776 244. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-iodophenethylamine, some trade or
777 other names: (2C-I).
778 245. 6-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran, some
779 trade or other names: (6-APDB).
780 246. 6-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran, some trade or other
781 names: (6-APB).
782 247. 5-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran, some
783 trade or other names: (5-APDB).
784 248. 5-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran, some trade or other
785 names: (5-APB).
Page 28

names: (5-APB).
SB321 INTRODUCED
786 249. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine, some
787 trade or other names: (2C-T-7).
788 250. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenethylamine, some
789 trade or other names: (2C-P).
790 251. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-bromoamphetamine, some trade or
791 other names: (DOB).
792 252. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-bromobenzylpiperazine, some trade
793 or other names: (2C-B-BZP).
794 253. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-bromophenethylamine, some trade or
795 other names: (2C-B).
796 254. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chlorophenethylamine, some trade
797 or other names: (2C-C).
798 255. 2,5-Dimethoxy-(4-ethylthio)phenethylamine, some
799 trade or other names: (2C-T-2).
800 256. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-iodoamphetamine, some trade or
801 other names: (DOI).
802 257. 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylamphetamine, some trade or
803 other names: (DOM).
804 258. 2,5-Dimethoxyphenethylamine, some trade or other
805 names: (2C-H).
806 259.
807 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl-4-bromo)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine,
808 some trade or other names: (25B-NBOMe).
809 260.
810 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl-4-chloro)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine
811 , some trade or other names: (25C-NBOMe).
812 261.
813 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl-4-ethyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine,
Page 29

2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl-4-ethyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine,
SB321 INTRODUCED
814 some trade or other names: (25E-NBOMe).
815 262. 2-Ethylmethcathinone, some trade or other names:
816 (2-EMC).
817 263.
818 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine, some
819 trade or other names: (25H-NBOMe).
820 264. BZP (Benzylpiperazine).
821 265. para-Fluorophenylpiperazine.
822 266. 1-(4-Methylphenyl)piperazine.
823 267. meta-Cholorophenylpiperazine.
824 268. para-Methoxyphenylpiperazine.
825 269. DBZP (1,4-dibenzylpiperazine).
826 270. TFMPP (3-Trifluoromethylphenylpiperazine).
827 271. 2C-T-4
828 (2,5-Dimethoxy-4-isopropylthiophenethylamine.
829 272. 2C-T (2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylthiophenethylamine).
830 273. 2C-D (2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl)ethanamine).
831 274. 2C-N 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitrophenethylamine.
832 275. 5-methoxy-N,N-diallyltryptamine, some trade or
833 other names: (5-MeO-DALT).
834 276. 5-Methoxy-N,N-Diisopropyltryptamine, some trade or
835 other names: (5-MeO-DIPT).
836 277. 5-Methoxy-alpha-methyltryptamine, some trade or
837 other names: (5-MeO-AMT).
838 278. 4-Acetoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine, some trade or
839 other names: (4-AcO-DMT).
840 279. 4-Hydroxy-N,N-diethyltryptamine, some trade or
841 other names: (4-HO-DET).
Page 30

other names: (4-HO-DET).
SB321 INTRODUCED
842 280. 4-Hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine, some trade or
843 other names: (4-HO-DIPT).
844 281. 4-Hydroxy-N-methyl-N-ethyltryptamine, some trade
845 or other names: (4-OH-MET).
846 282. 5-Methoxy-N,N-diethyltryptamine, some trade or
847 other names: (5-MeO-DET).
848 283. 5-Methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine, some
849 trade or other names: (5-MeO-MIPT).
850 284. 4-Acetoxy-N,N-diethyltryptamine, some trade or
851 other names: (4-AcO-DET).
852 285. 4-Acetoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine, some
853 trade or other names: (4-AcO-MIPT).
854 286. N,N-Dipropyltryptamine, some trade or other names:
855 (DPT).
856 287. N,N-Diisopropyltryptamine, some trade or other
857 names: (DIPT).
858 288. 4-Methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine, some
859 trade or other names: (4-MeO-MIPT).
860 289. Tyramine (4-Hydroxyphenethylamine).
861 290. 5-Hydroxy-alpha-methyltryptamine.
862 291. 5-Hydroxy-N-methyltryptamine.
863 292. 5-Methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine.
864 293. 5-Methyl-N,N-dimethyltryptamine.
865 294. Diphenylprolinol, some trade or other names:
866 (D2PM; diphenyl-2-pyrrolidinemethanol).
867 295. 3,4 Dichloromethylphenidate, some trade or other
868 names: (3,4-CTMP).
869 296. 3-chloromethyl-phenidate, some trade or other
Page 31

296. 3-chloromethyl-phenidate, some trade or other
SB321 INTRODUCED
870 names: (3-CTMP).
871 297. 4-Methylmethylphenidate.
872 298. 4-Fluoromethyl-phenidate, some trade or other
873 names: (4-FTMP).
874 299. Ethylphenidate.
875 300. Etizolam (Etilaam, Etizola, Sedekopan, Pasaden,
876 Depas).
877 301. Phenazepam.
878 302. Pyrazolam.
879 303. CL-218,872.
880 304. Zopiclone.
881 305. Salvinorin A.
882 306. AH-7921.
883 307. O-Desmethyltramadol, some trade or other names:
884 (O-DT; ODT).
885 308. Desmorphine (Dihydrodesoxymorphine; permonid;
886 krokodil; crocodile).
887 309. Acetyl Fentanyl (desmethylfentanyl).
888 310. 1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl)piperazine
889 (MT-45).
890 311. 1-(2-methoxyphenyl)piperazine, some trade or other
891 names: (MOPIP).
892 312. 1-(4-Chlorophenyl)piperazine, some trade or other
893 names: (pCPP).
894 313. para-Methoxyphenyl-piperazine, some trade or other
895 names: (MBZP).
896 314. Methylmethaqualone.
897 315. Etaqualone.
Page 32

315. Etaqualone.
SB321 INTRODUCED
898 316. 5-Iodo-2-aminoindane, some trade or other names:
899 (5-IAI).
900 317. 5,6-(Methylenedioxy)-2-aminoindane, some trade or
901 other names: (5,6-MDAI).
902 318. 4,5-(Methylenedioxy)-2-aminoindane, some trade or
903 other names: (4,5-MDAI).
904 319. MMAI.
905 320. W-15.
906 321. W-18.
907 322. Mitragynine.
908 323. Hydroxymitragynine.
909 324. Butyrfentanyl
910 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-pyridinyl]butyramide).
911 325. Beta-Hydroxythiofentanyl
912 (N-phenyl-N-{1-[2-hydroxy-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl]-4-piperdinyl}-pr
913 opanamide).
914 326. 4-methylphenethyl acetyl fentanyl
915 (N-phenyl-N-{1-[2-(4-methylphenyl)ethyl]-4-piperdinyl}-acetami
916 de).
917 327. Acrylfentanyl
918 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperdinyl]-prop-2-enamide).
919 328. 3-Allylfentanyl
920 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-(3s,4R)-3-prop-2-enyl-4-piperid
921 inyl]-propanamide).
922 329. Benzodioxole fentanyl
923 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-benzo[d][1,3]dio
924 xole-5-carboxamide).
925 330. Benzyl carfentanil
Page 33

330. Benzyl carfentanil
SB321 INTRODUCED
926 (N-phenyl-N-(1-benzyl-4-methylcarboxylate-4-piperidinyl)-propa
927 namide).
928 331. Brifentanil
929 (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-{(3R,4S)-1-[2-(4-ethyl-5-oxotetrazol-1-y
930 l)ethyl]-3-methyl-4-piperdinyl}-2-methoxyacetamide).
931 332. Cyclopentylfentanyl
932 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl)-cyclopentanecarb
933 oxamide).
934 333. 2,5-Dimethylfentanyl
935 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-2,5-dimethyl-4-piperidinyl]-pro
936 pranamide).
937 334. 4-Fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl
938 (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl)-isobut
939 yramide).
940 335. Furanyl fentanyl
941 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl]furan-2-carboxami
942 de).
943 336. Furanylethyl fentanyl
944 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-furanylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-propanamide).
945 337. Isobutyryl fentanyl
946 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperdinyl]-2-methylpropanami
947 de).
948 338. Lofentanil
949 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-(3R,4S)-3-methyl-4-methylcarbox
950 ylate-4-piperidinyl]-propanamide).
951 339. 4-Methoxybutyrfentanyl
952 (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butyr
953 amide).
Page 34

amide).
SB321 INTRODUCED
954 340. 4-Methoxymethylfentanyl
955 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-methoxymethyl-4-piperidinyl]-
956 propanamide).
957 341. Meta-fluorobutyryl fentanyl
958 (N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidnyl)-butyram
959 ide).
960 342. Meta-fluorofentanyl
961 (N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidnyl)-propana
962 mide).
963 343. 3-Methylbutyrfentanyl
964 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butyramide).
965 344. N-Methylcarfentanyl
966 (N-phenyl-N-(1-methyl-4-methylcarboxylate-4-piperidinyl)-propa
967 namide).
968 345. Methoxyacetylfentanyl
969 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-2-methoxyacetami
970 de).
971 346. Mirfentanyl
972 (N-(2-pyrazinyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-2-furamid
973 e).
974 347. Ocfentanil
975 (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperdinyl]-2-metho
976 xyacetamide).
977 348. Ohmefentanyl
978 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenylethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidiny
979 l]-propanamide).
980 349. Ortho-fluorobutyryl fentanyl
981 (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidnyl)-butyram
Page 35

(N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidnyl)-butyram
SB321 INTRODUCED
982 ide).
983 350. Ortho-fluorofentanyl
984 (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidnyl)-propana
985 mide).
986 351. Para-chlorofentanyl
987 (N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-propan
988 amide).
989 352. Para-chloroisobutyryl fentanyl
990 (N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-isobut
991 yramide).
992 353. 4-Fluorobutyryl fentanyl
993 (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butyra
994 mide).
995 354. Para-methoxyfentanyl
996 (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-propa
997 namide).
998 355. Para-methylfentanyl
999 (N-(4-methylphenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-propan
1000 amide).
1001 356. 4-Phenyl fentanyl
1002 (N-phenyl-N-[4-phenyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-propana
1003 mide).
1004 357. Trefentanyl
1005 (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-{1-[2-(4-ethyl-5-oxo-4,5-dihydro-1H-tetr
1006 azol-1-yl)ethyl]-4-phenyl-4-piperdinyl}-propanamide).
1007 358. Valeryl fentanyl
1008 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-pentanamide).
1009 359. Alpha-Methylacetylfentanyl
Page 36

359. Alpha-Methylacetylfentanyl
SB321 INTRODUCED
1010 (N-phenyl-N-[1-phenylpropan-2-yl)-4-piperidinyl]-acetamide).
1011 360. Alpha-Methylbutyrfentanyl
1012 (N-phenyl-N-[1-phenylpropan-2-yl)-4-piperidinyl]-butyramide).
1013 361. Alpha-Methylthiofentanyl
1014 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(1-thienyl-2-ylpropan-2-yl)-4-piperidinyl]-prop
1015 anamide).
1016 362. Beta-Hydroxy fentanyl
1017 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-propan
1018 amide).
1019 363. Beta-Methyl fentanyl
1020 (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylpropyl)-4-piperdinyl]-propanamide).
1021 364. U-47700
1022 (3,4-Dichloro-N-[(1R,2R)-2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methyl
1023 benzamide).
1024 365. W-19
1025 ((Z)-N-{1-[2-(4-aminophenyl)ethyl]piperidin-2-ylidene}-4-chlor
1026 obenzenesulfonamide).
1027 366. Flubromazolam
1028 (8-bromo-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a]
1029 [1,4]benzodiazepine).
1030 367. Tianeptine.
1031 (5)a. A synthetic controlled substance analogue, being
1032 a material, mixture, or preparation that contains any chemical
1033 structure of which is chemically similar to the chemical
1034 structure of any other controlled substance in Schedule I or
1035 Schedule II or that satisfies any one of the following:
1036 1. Has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic
1037 effect on the central nervous system that mimics or is similar
Page 37

effect on the central nervous system that mimics or is similar
SB321 INTRODUCED
1038 to or greater than the stimulant, depressant, or
1039 hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a
1040 controlled substance in Schedule I or Schedule II.
1041 2. With respect to a particular person, if the person
1042 represents or intends that the substance have a stimulant,
1043 depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous
1044 system that is substantially similar to or greater than the
1045 stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central
1046 nervous system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or
1047 Schedule II and the substance is actually capable of producing
1048 a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
1049 central nervous system that mimics, is similar to, or is
1050 greater than the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic
1051 effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance
1052 in Schedule I or Schedule II.
1053 3. Has been demonstrated to have binding activity at
1054 one or more cannabinoid receptors.
1055 4. Is capable of exhibiting cannabinoid-like activity.
1056 5. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1057 or derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)indole or
1058 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane by substitution at the
1059 nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl
1060 halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1061 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1062 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1063 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1064 in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
1065 in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
Page 38

in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
SB321 INTRODUCED
1066 6. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1067 or derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole by substitution at the
1068 nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl
1069 halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1070 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1071 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1072 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted
1073 in the pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
1074 in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
1075 7. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1076 or derived from 1-(1-naphthylmethyl)indene by substitution at
1077 the 3-position of the indene ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl
1078 halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1079 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1080 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1081 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1082 in the indene ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
1083 in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
1084 8. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1085 or derived from 3-phenylacetylindole by substitution at the
1086 nitrogen atom of the indole ring with alkyl, alkyl halide,
1087 aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1088 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1089 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1090 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not further substituted
1091 in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
1092 in the phenyl ring to any extent.
1093 9. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
Page 39

9. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
SB321 INTRODUCED
1094 or derived from 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol by substitution
1095 at the 5-position of the phenolic ring by alkyl, alkyl halide,
1096 aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1097 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1098 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1099 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, whether or not substituted in the
1100 cyclohexyl ring to any extent.
1101 10. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1102 or derived from 3-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole or
1103 1H-indol-3-yl-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropoyl)methane by
1104 substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl,
1105 alkyl halide, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl,
1106 aliphatic alcohol, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1107 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1108 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1109 in the indole ring to any extent.
1110 11. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1111 or derived from 3-(adamant-1-oyl)indole or
1112 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-adamantyl)methane by substitution at the
1113 nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl
1114 halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1115 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1116 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1117 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1118 in the indole ring to any extent.
1119 12. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1120 or derived from N-(1-naphthalenyl)indole-3-carboxyamide or
1121 1H-indol-(N-naphthyl)-3-carboxamide by substitution at the
Page 40

1H-indol-(N-naphthyl)-3-carboxamide by substitution at the
SB321 INTRODUCED
1122 nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl
1123 halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1124 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1125 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1126 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1127 in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
1128 in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
1129 13. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1130 or derived from N-(adamantan-1yl)indole-3-carboxyamide or
1131 1H-indol-3-carboxamide-(1-adamantyl) by substitution at the
1132 nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl
1133 halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1134 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1135 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1136 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1137 in the indole ring to any extent.
1138 14. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1139 or derived from N-(adamantan-1yl)indazole-3-carboxyamide or
1140 1H-indazole-3-carboxamide-(1-adamantyl) by substitution at the
1141 nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide,
1142 aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1143 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1144 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1145 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1146 in the indazole ring to any extent.
1147 15. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1148 or derived from
1149 N-[(1S)-1-(aminocarbonyl)-2-methylpropoyl]indazole-3-carboxyam
Page 41

N-[(1S)-1-(aminocarbonyl)-2-methylpropoyl]indazole-3-carboxyam
SB321 INTRODUCED
1150 ide or
1151 1H-indazole-3-carboxamide-N-[(1S)-1-(aminocarbonyl)-2-methylpr
1152 opoyl] by substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indazole
1153 ring by alkyl, alkyl halide, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide,
1154 alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1155 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1156 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1157 in the indazole ring to any extent.
1158 16. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1159 or derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)indazole or
1160 1H-indazole-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane by substitution at the
1161 nitrogen atom of the indazole ring by alkyl, alkyl halide,
1162 aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl, aliphatic alcohol,
1163 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1164 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1165 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1166 in the indazole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
1167 in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
1168 17. Any compound structurally analogous to, mimicking,
1169 or derived from 3-(carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl ester)indole
1170 or 1H-indol-3-carboxylic acid-(8-quinolinyl)ester by
1171 substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by alkyl,
1172 alkyl halide, aryl halide, alkyl aryl halide, alkenyl,
1173 aliphatic alcohol, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1174 (N-alkylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl, (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl,
1175 or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl whether or not further substituted
1176 in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
1177 in the quinoline ring to any extent.
Page 42

in the quinoline ring to any extent.
SB321 INTRODUCED
1178 18. Any compound structurally related to
1179 2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine by substitution of
1180 the iodo moiety (4 position) with other halides, alkyl, alkyl
1181 halides, thioalkyl, cycloalkyl, cycloalkylhalides and/or
1182 substitution at the nitrogen atom of the ethanamine with
1183 alkyl, alkyl halide, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
1184 cycloalkylethyl, phenyl, benzyl whether or not further
1185 substituted in the (either) phenyl ring to any extent.
1186 19. Any compound structurally related to
1187 2,5-dimethoxy-4-chloroamphetamine by substitution of the
1188 chloro moiety (4 position) with other halides, alkyl, alkyl
1189 halides, thioalkyl, cycloalkyl, cycloalkylhalides and/or
1190 substitution at the nitrogen atom with alkyl, alkyl halide,
1191 alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, phenyl, benzyl
1192 whether or not further substituted in the (either) phenyl ring
1193 to any extent.
1194 20. Any compound structurally related to
1195 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone (cathinone) by substitution of
1196 the amine with alkyl, alkyl halide, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
1197 cycloalkylethyl, phenyl, benzyl whether or not further
1198 substituted in the (either) phenyl ring to any extent.
1199 21. Any compound structurally related to
1200 a-pyrrolidinopentiophenone (a-pvp) whether or not further
1201 substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent, whether or not
1202 further substituted in the pyrrolidine ring to any extent.
1203 b. A synthetic controlled substance or analogue in
1204 subdivision (4) or this subdivision does not include any of
1205 the following:
Page 43

the following:
SB321 INTRODUCED
1206 1. Any substance for which there is an approved new
1207 drug application under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
1208 Act.
1209 2. With respect to a particular person, any substance,
1210 if an exemption is in effect for investigational use, for that
1211 person, as provided by 21 U.S.C. § 355, and the person is
1212 registered as a controlled substance researcher as required
1213 under sectionSection 152.12, subdivisionSubdivision 3, to the
1214 extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to
1215 the exemption and registration.
1216 c. A controlled substance analogue is treated as a
1217 controlled substance in Schedule I.
1218 d. After the Alabama Department of Forensic Sciences
1219 has determined a substance to be a synthetic controlled
1220 substance analogue under this section, the department shall
1221 notify the Alabama Department of Public Health with
1222 information relevant to scheduling as provided by Section
1223 20-2-20."
1224 Section 3. Section 1 of Act 2025-385 of the 2025
1225 Regular Session, now appearing as Chapter 12 of Title 28, Code
1226 of Alabama 1975, regulating the sale of consumable hemp
1227 products, is repealed.
1228 Section 4. This act shall become effective on July 1,
1229 2026.
Page 44